Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1016
Rules and
regulations.

The bureau
shall adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations necessary to administer sections 81-1008 to 81-1025.

Laws 1969, c. 770, § 9, p. 2921;

Laws 2012, LB779, § 6.